Utah statutes.
73-4-11.   Report and recommendation by engineer to court -- Notice --
Public meeting.
(1)  Within 30 days after the expiration of the 90 days allowed for filing
statements of claims, the state engineer shall begin to tabulate the facts
contained in the statements filed and to investigate, whenever the state
engineer shall consider necessary, the facts set forth in the statements by
reference to the surveys already made or by further surveys, and shall as
expeditiously as possible report to the court a recommendation of how all
rights involved shall be determined.
(2)  After full consideration of the statements of claims, and of the surveys,
records, and files, and after a personal examination of the river system or
water source involved, if the examination is considered necessary, the state
engineer shall:
(a)  formulate a report and a proposed determination of all rights to the use
of the water of the river system or water source;
(b)  mail or deliver a copy of the report and proposed determination to each
claimant with notice that any claimant dissatisfied with the report and
proposed determination may within 90 days from the date of mailing or delivery
file with the clerk of the district court a written objection; and
(c)  hold a public meeting in the area covered by the report and proposed
determination to describe the report and proposed determination to the
claimants.
(3)  The state engineer shall distribute the waters from the natural streams
or other natural sources:
(a)  in accordance with the proposed determination or modification to the
proposed determination by court order until a final decree is rendered by the
court; or
(b)  if the right to the use of the waters has been decreed or adjudicated, in
accordance with the decree until the decree is reversed, modified, vacated, or
otherwise legally set aside.
